Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2804.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 46-12.2-4.4 of the General Laws in Chapter 46-12.2 entitled "Rhode
Island Infrastructure Bank" is hereby amended to read as follows:
46-12.2-4.4. Establishment of the resilient rhody infrastructure fund.
(a) There is hereby authorized and created within the Rhode Island infrastructure bank the
resilient rhody infrastructure fund for the purpose of providing technical, administrative, and
financial assistance to local governmental units for resiliency and stormwater abatement projects.
The Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall review and approve all applications for projects to be
financed through the resilient rhody infrastructure fund.
The Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate
the provisions of this section which may include, without limitation, forms for financial assistance
applications, loan agreements, and other instruments. All rules and regulations promulgated
pursuant to this chapter shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of
title 42 (“administrative procedures”).
(b) The Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall have all the powers necessary and
convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this section including, without
limiting the generality of the preceding statement, the authority:
(1) To receive and disburse such funds from the state and federal government as may be
available for the purpose of the fund subject to the provisions of this section;

(2) To make and enter into binding commitments to provide financial assistance to local
governmental units from amounts on deposit in the fund;
(3) To levy administrative fees on eligible borrowers as necessary to effectuate the
provisions of this section, provided the fees have been previously authorized by an agreement
between the Rhode Island infrastructure bank and the eligible borrower;
(4) To engage the services of third-party vendors to provide professional services;
(5) To establish one or more accounts within the fund; and
(6) Such other authority as granted to the Rhode Island infrastructure bank under this
chapter.
(c) Subject to the provisions of this section and to any agreements with the holders of any
bonds of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank or any trustee therefor, amounts held by the Rhode
Island infrastructure bank for the account of the fund shall be applied by the Rhode Island
infrastructure bank, either by direct expenditure, disbursement, or transfer to one or more other
funds and accounts held by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank or maintained under any trust
agreement pertaining to bonds, either alone or with other funds of the Rhode Island infrastructure
bank, to the following purposes:
(1) To provide financial assistance to local governmental units to finance costs of approved
projects, as set forth in subsection (a) of this section, and to refinance the costs of the projects,
subject to such terms and conditions, if any, as are determined by the Rhode Island infrastructure
bank;
(2) To fund reserves for bonds of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank and to purchase
insurance and pay the premiums therefor, and pay fees and expenses of letters or lines of credit and
costs of reimbursement to the issuers thereof for any payments made thereon or on any insurance,
and to otherwise provide security for, and a source of payment for obligations of the Rhode Island
infrastructure bank, by pledge, lien, assignment, or otherwise as provided in this chapter;
(3) To pay expenses of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank in administering the fund;
(4) To provide a reserve for, or to otherwise secure, amounts payable by borrowers on loans
and obligations outstanding in the event of default thereof; amounts in any account in the fund may
be applied to defaults on loans outstanding to the borrower for which the account was established
and, on a parity basis with all other accounts, to defaults on any loans or obligations outstanding;
and
(5) To provide a reserve for, or to otherwise secure, by pledge, lien, assignment, or
otherwise as provided in this chapter, any bonds of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank.
(6) To provide financial support to local governmental units to support, develop, and
LC005353 - Page 2 of 7

implement risk interpretation tools to aid in:
(i) Quantifying financial risk and the value of risk financing and transfer investments
including, but not limited to, insurance and alternative methods of risk transfer to reduce costs
associated with catastrophic event recovery; and
(ii) Efforts that seek to ensure a property's insurability.
(d) In addition to other remedies of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank under any loan
agreement or otherwise provided by law, the Rhode Island infrastructure bank may also recover
from a borrower, in an action in superior court, any amount due the Rhode Island infrastructure
bank together with any other actual damages the Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall have
sustained from the failure or refusal of the borrower to make the payments or abide by the terms of
the loan agreement.
(e) The Rhode Island infrastructure bank may create one or more loan loss reserve funds
to serve as further security for any loans made by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank or any bonds
of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank issued to fund energy efficiency improvements in public
buildings in accordance with this section.
(f) To the extent possible, and in accordance with law, the Rhode Island infrastructure bank
shall encourage the use of project labor agreements for projects over ten million dollars
($10,000,000) and local hiring on projects funded under this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 46-12.2 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Infrastructure
Bank" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
46-12.2-28. Municipal resilience program -- Eligible costs.
(a) Amounts designated by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank for the municipal
resilience program and/or municipal resilience projects may be used by local governmental units
for:
(1) Resiliency related infrastructure planning processes;
(2) Resiliency related insurability planning;
(3) The support, development, and/or implementation of risk interpretation tools to aid in:
(i) Quantifying financial risk and the value of risk financing and transfer investments
including, but not limited to, insurance and alternative methods of risk transfer to reduce costs
associated with catastrophic event recovery; and
(ii) Efforts that seek to ensure a property's insurability.
SECTION 3. Sections 46-23.3-2 and 46-23.3-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 46-23.3
entitled "The Ocean State Climate Adaptation and Resilience Fund" are hereby amended to read as
follows:
LC005353 - Page 3 of 7

46-23.3-2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following
meanings:
(1) “Adaptation and resilience projects” means those projects on public land that protect or
enhance coastal or riverine habitats to address climate change impacts. Adaptation and resilience
projects include, but are not limited to: those projects that reduce the vulnerability of low-lying
infrastructure on public land through measures that include removal and relocation of
infrastructure; restoration of river and stream floodplains, including regrading of banks;
revegetation; acquisition of that area of land necessary to maintain and preserve public access; and
redesigning, resizing, and replacing culverts and bridge spans at existing wetland crossings; risk
financing and transfer investment including, but not limited to, insurance and alternative methods
of risk financing and transfer to protect nature-based solutions from catastrophic risk; and those
efforts that seek to ensure a property's insurability.
(2) “Bank” means the Rhode Island infrastructure bank.
(3) “Climate change impacts” means and includes, but is not limited to: flooding, erosion,
sea level rise, and storm surge.
(4) “Council” means the coastal resources management council.
(5) “Department” means the department of environmental management.
(6) “Director” means the director of the department of environmental management.
(7) “Infrastructure” means and includes, but is not limited to: roads, parking lots, and other
paved surfaces; shoreline protection structures; buildings; water control structures; culverts; other
structures; and remnants of development.
(8) “Public land(s)” means property owned by state or municipal governments, including
any quasi-public agencies thereof, public and private lands dedicated to public use, including lands
that provide access to shorelines and riverbanks. Public lands include properties where the state or
municipality holds an easement for public purposes.
(9) “Shoreline protection structures” means and includes, but is not limited to: revetments,
bulkheads, seawalls and floodwalls, breakwaters, jetties, and other structures, the purpose or effect
of which is to control the erosion of coastal or river features, and includes, but is not limited to, any
sheet pile walls, concrete or stone walls.
46-23.3-4. Establishment — The Ocean State Climate Adaptation and Resilience
fund.
(a) Establishment. There is established within the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, the
Ocean State Climate Adaptation and Resilience fund (the “OSCAR fund”).
LC005353 - Page 4 of 7

(b) Financing. The fund shall consist of the following sources:
(1) Sums the general assembly may appropriate;
(2) Monies received from federal, state, or other sources, including bond funds, for the
purposes of the OSCAR fund;
(3) Monies received from any private donor for the OSCAR fund; and
(4) Any interest earned on the monies in the fund.
(c) Allocation of OSCAR funds. OSCAR funds shall be used to carry out the purposes of
this chapter as follows:
(1) The administrative expenses required to carry out the activities of the program as
described in this chapter shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) each for the Rhode Island
infrastructure bank, coastal resources management council, and the department of environmental
management annually, which sum shall not include the cost of issuing bonds or notes, if any. The
department and the council shall be responsible for submitting annual budget requests for its
administrative and implementation costs of the program to the bank;
(2) The planning, design, engineering, construction, and monitoring of adaptation and
resilience projects as defined in this chapter; and
(3) The OSCAR projects approved by the department and the council upon
recommendation of the technical advisory committee. Only grants approved through the process
established by the department and council shall be eligible for funding under this program. Subject
to the availability of funds in the OSCAR fund, the bank shall award funding upon receipt of written
approval of the department and council; and
(4) The support, development, and implementation of risk interpretation tools to aid in
quantifying financial risk and the value of risk financing and transfer investments including, but
not limited to, insurance and alternative methods of risk transfer in order to reduce costs associated
with catastrophic event recovery.
(d) OSCAR fund grants. Factors to be taken into consideration by the technical advisory
committee for the purposes of granting monies to municipalities and the state for OSCAR grants,
for determining the eligibility of projects for financial assistance, and in prioritizing the selection
of projects by the technical committee shall include, but need not be limited to:
(1) Consistency with the following where applicable: the council’s most recent projections
for sea level rise, the coastal habitat restoration strategy, the state nonpoint source pollution control
plan; and other applicable state and federal laws;
(2) The ability and authority of the applicant to carry out and properly maintain the
adaptation and resilience project;
LC005353 - Page 5 of 7

(3) Whether the project will enhance public access to public land;
(4) The severity to, or the risk and/or extent of, infrastructure degradation on public land;
(5) The extent of the use by the public of the public land;
(6) The proposed milestones to ensure that the project is completed as designed and
approved;
(7) Whether the adaptation and resilience project can also be shown to create or replace
habitat losses that benefit fish and wildlife resources;
(8) Potential water quality improvements;
(9) Potential improvements to fish and wildlife habitats for species that are identified as
rare or endangered by the Rhode Island natural history survey or the Federal Endangered Species
Act, 16 U.S.C. § 1531 et seq.;
(10) The level and extent of collaboration by partners (e.g., municipality, nongovernment
organization, watershed council, federal agency, etc.); and
(11) Overall potential benefits to the public and estimated length of time frame of benefit;
and
(12) The insurability of the adaptation and resilience project.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005353
========
LC005353 - Page 6 of 7